Utah statutes.
53A-17a-108.   Weighted pupil units for small school district administrative costs -- Appropriation for charter school administrative costs.

(1)  Administrative costs weighted pupil units are computed and distributed to small school districts in accordance with the following schedule:

 

Administrative Costs Schedule

 



School District Enrollment as of October 1

Weighted Pupil Units

 



1 - 500 students

95

 



501 - 1,000 students

80

 



1,001 - 2,000 students

70

 



2,001 - 5,000 students

60

(2) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), money appropriated to the State Board of Education for charter school administrative costs shall be distributed to charter schools in the amount of $100 for each charter school student in enrollment.

(b) (i)  If money appropriated for charter school administrative costs is insufficient to provide the amount per student prescribed in Subsection (2)(a), the appropriation shall be allocated among charter schools in proportion to each charter school's enrollment as a percentage of the total enrollment in charter schools.

(ii)  If the State Board of Education makes adjustments to Minimum School Program allocations under Section 53A-17a-105, the allocation provided in Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall be determined after adjustments are made under Section 53A-17a-105.

(c)  Charter schools are encouraged to identify and use cost-effective methods of performing administrative functions, including contracting for administrative services with the State Charter School Board as provided in Section 53A-1a-501.6.

(3)  Charter schools are not eligible for funds for administrative costs under Subsection (1).

